North Carolina, session 2025, SB998.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-562.8 and any other provision of law
to the contrary, the State Education Assistance Authority shall transfer the following amounts of
the unencumbered, nonrecurring funds remaining at the end of the 2025-2026 fiscal year that
would otherwise be carried forward in the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the award of opportunity
scholarship grants pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.8(d)(2):
(1) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to the Housing Finance Agency
for low-cost financing for developers to build new affordable housing units.
(2) The sum of forty million dollars ($40,000,000) to the Department of Health
and Human Services for its Transitions to Community Living program.
SECTION 1.(b) The funds transferred pursuant to subsection (a) of this section are
hereby appropriated to the Housing Finance Agency and the Department of Health and Human
Services, respectively, for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. Each agency may use three percent (3%) of
those funds for the administration of the programs identified in subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
*S998-v-1*